Washington statutes.
RCW 35.54.020

Rules and regulations.

Every city and town operating under the provisions of this chapter shall prescribe by ordinance appropriate rules and regulations for the maintenance and operation of the guaranty fund not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.54.020. Prior: 1933 c 109 s 1, part; 1927 c 209 s 3, part; 1925 ex.s. c 183 s 3, part; 1923 c 141 s 3, part; RRS s 9351-3, part.]